Washington statutes.
RCW 13.16.050

Federal or state aid.

In connection with the financing of facilities and the employment of a staff of juvenile officers for dependent, delinquent and wayward children, the various boards of county commissioners affected shall attempt to secure such advances, loans, grants in aid, donations as gifts as may be secured from the federal government or any of its agencies or from the state government or from other public or private institutions or individuals.

[ 1945 c 188 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 2004-4.]